build/hi_android/json.lexc
!!!json.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Punct +Quotes +OpeningSBracket +ClosingSBracket +OpeningCBracket +ClosingCBracket +Comma +Hash +Colon +Relative

LEXICON Root

Json ;

LEXICON Json

%"[stem]+Punct+Quotes:%" #;
[[stem]+Punct+OpeningSBracket:[ #;
][stem]+Punct+ClosingSBracket:] #;
{[stem]+Punct+OpeningCBracket:{ #;
}[stem]+Punct+ClosingCBracket:} #;
,[stem]+Punct+Comma:, #;
%#[stem]+Punct+Hash+Relative:%# #;
%:[stem]+Punct+Colon:%: #;
